Utah statutes.
58-60-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Client" or "patient" means an individual who consults or is examined or
interviewed by a mental health therapist acting in his professional capacity.
(2)  "Confidential communication" means information, including information
obtained by the mental health therapist's examination of the client or
patient, which is:
(a) (i)  transmitted between the client or patient and a mental health
therapist in the course of that relationship; or
(ii)  transmitted among the client or patient, the mental health therapist,
and individuals who are participating in the diagnosis or treatment under the
direction of the mental health therapist, including members of the client's or
patient's family; and
(b)  made in confidence, for the diagnosis or treatment of the client or
patient by the mental health therapist, and by a means not intended to be
disclosed to third persons other than those individuals:
(i)  present to further the interest of the client or patient in the
consultation, examination, or interview;
(ii)  reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communications; or
(iii)  participating in the diagnosis and treatment of the client or patient
under the direction of the mental health therapist.
(3)  "Hypnosis" means, regarding individuals exempted from licensure under
this chapter, a process by which one individual induces or assists another
individual into a hypnotic state without the use of drugs or other substances
and for the purpose of increasing motivation or to assist the individual to
alter lifestyles or habits.
(4)  "Individual" means a natural person.
(5)  "Mental health therapist" means an individual licensed under this title
as:
(a)  a  physician and surgeon, or osteopathic physician engaged in the
practice of mental health therapy;
(b) an advanced practice registered nurse, specializing in psychiatric mental
health nursing;
(c)  a psychologist qualified to engage in the practice of mental health
therapy;
(d)  a clinical social worker;
(e)  a certified social worker;
(f)  a marriage and family therapist; or
(g)  a professional counselor.
(6)  "Mental illness" means a mental or emotional condition defined in an
approved diagnostic and statistical manual for mental disorders generally
recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under Subsection
(5).
(7)  "Practice of mental health therapy" means treatment or prevention of
mental illness, including:
(a)  conducting a professional evaluation of an individual's condition of
mental health, mental illness, or emotional disorder consistent with standards
generally recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under
Subsection (5);
(b)  establishing a diagnosis in accordance with established written standards
generally recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under
Subsection (5);
(c)  prescribing a plan for the prevention or treatment of a condition of
mental illness or emotional disorder; and
(d)  engaging in the conduct of professional intervention, including
psychotherapy by the application of established methods and procedures
generally recognized in the professions of mental health therapy listed under
Subsection (5).
(8)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-60-109.
(9)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and
58-60-110, and may be further defined by division rule.
